Utah statutes.
78B-6-1228.   Court determines reasonable compensation for tenant.
If consent is not given, filed, and entered as provided in Section 78B-6-1227
before a judgment of sale is rendered, the court shall determine what
proportion of the proceeds of the sale, after deducting expenses, will be a
just and reasonable sum to be allowed on account of the estate, and order the
amount paid to the party, or deposited in the court for the person, as the
case may require.
